California statutes. Fish and Game Code
Unless otherwise specified, the following conditions apply to each commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement issued to take, possess aboard a boat, or land fish for commercial purposes and to each commercial boat registration issued by the department, except licenses issued pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 8030):

(a) The person to whom a commercial fishing permit or other entitlement is issued shall have a valid commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7852 that is not revoked or suspended.

(b) The commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may suspend, revoke, or cancel commercial fishing privileges
 for a period of time to be determined by the commission for the
 following reasons:

(1) The person was not lawfully entitled to be issued the license, permit, or other entitlement.

(2) A violation of this code, the terms of the permit or other entitlement, or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, by the licensee, permittee, person holding the entitlement, or their agent, servant, employee, or person acting under the licensee’s, permittee’s, or entitled person’s direction or control.

(3) A violation of any federal law relating to the fishery for which the license, permit, or other entitlement was issued by the licensee, permittee, person holding the entitlement, or their agent, servant, employee, or person acting under the licensee’s, permittee’s, or entitled person’s
 direction or control.

(c) The person to whom the commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement is issued shall be present when fish are being taken, possessed aboard a boat, or landed for commercial purposes. This subdivision does not apply to commercial fishing vessel permits or licenses.

(d) The commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement shall be in the licensee’s, permittee’s, or entitled person’s possession, or immediately available to the licensee, permittee, or entitled person at all times when engaged in any activity for which the commercial fishing license, permit, or entitlement is required.

(e) Not more than one individual commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement of a
 single type shall be issued to an individual person and not more than one commercial vessel fishing license, permit, or other entitlement of a single type shall be issued for each vessel.

(f) Any landing of fish used to qualify for, or renew, a commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement shall be reported on electronic fish tickets delivered to the department pursuant to Section 8046.

(g) In addition to any other requirements in Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 8040), the name of the person issued the commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement authorizing the taking of the fish shall be included on the
 electronic fish ticket for that landing.

(h) An application for a commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement shall be made on a form containing the information the department may require. The commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement shall be signed by the holder prior to use.

(i) Any person who has had a commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement suspended or revoked shall not engage in that fishery, and shall not obtain any other commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement that authorizes engaging in that fishery, while the suspension or revocation is in effect.

(j) A commercial fishing license, permit, or other entitlement is not transferable unless
 otherwise expressly specified in this code.

(k) Every commercial fishing license, permit, stamp, commercial boat registration, or other entitlement issued pursuant to this part, except commercial fish business licenses issued pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 8030), is valid from April 1 to March 31 of the next following calendar year or, if issued after the beginning of that term, for the remainder of that term.

(l) A person who holds a commercial fishing vessel permit or other entitlement authorizing the use of a vessel for commercial fishing shall also hold a valid commercial boat registration for that vessel, issued pursuant to Section 7881, that has not been suspended or revoked.

(m) A person who
 holds a commercial fishing license, permit, registration, or other entitlement, who moves or acquires a new address shall notify the department of the old and new addresses within three months of acquiring the new address.

(n) An application to transfer any permit or other entitlement to take fish for commercial purposes shall be deferred if the current holder of the permit or other entitlement is awaiting final resolution of any pending criminal, civil, or administrative action that could affect the status of the permit or other entitlement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 1.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7858.

In addition to the conditions specified in Section 7857, the following conditions apply to a commercial permit to take, possess aboard a boat, or land fish for commercial purposes in a limited entry fishery, as defined in Section 8100:

(a) The permit shall be renewed annually.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, an appeal for the denial of a renewal application or for a waiver of any landing requirements shall be reviewed and
 decided by the department. The appeal shall be received by the department or, if mailed, postmarked on or before March 31 following the permit year in which the applicant last held a valid permit for that fishery. The decision of the department may be appealed to the commission. This section does not apply to permits issued pursuant to Section 8550.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 525, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Commercial Salmon Trollers Enhancement and Restoration Program [7860. - 7863.]

7860.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (f) or (g), no person who is 18 years of age or more and less than 70 years of age, on or before April 1 of the current license year, shall take salmon for commercial purposes or be on board a vessel on which salmon are taken for commercial purposes while salmon are being taken or transported unless that person has a commercial fishing salmon stamp issued pursuant to this section affixed to his or her commercial fishing license.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (f) or (g), the operator of a vessel on which salmon are taken for commercial purposes shall not permit a person on board that vessel while salmon are being taken or transported unless that person was less than 18 years of
 age or 70 years of age or more on April 1 of the current license year or that person has a commercial fishing salmon stamp affixed to the person’s commercial fishing license.

(c) Except as provided in this subdivision, the department shall issue a commercial fishing salmon stamp upon application therefor and payment of the fee of eighty-five dollars ($85). For any commercial salmon season preceded by a commercial salmon season in which the commercial troll salmon landings in this state equal or exceed 3,000,000 pounds dressed weight, as determined by the department, the fee shall be increased by twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) for every 250,000 pounds over 3,000,000 pounds of dressed weight landings, except that the total fees as adjusted shall not exceed two hundred sixty dollars ($260).

(d) A commercial fishing salmon stamp is valid during the commercial salmon season of
 the year in which it was issued.

(e) Upon application and payment of an additional fee equal to that prescribed in subdivision (c), the department may issue an additional commercial fishing salmon stamp for a crewmember to the owner or operator of a vessel who holds a commercial fishing salmon stamp.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), one crewmember of a vessel for which a commercial fishing salmon stamp is issued pursuant to subdivision (e) may be aboard that vessel and take salmon for commercial purposes as a crewmember on that vessel without obtaining a commercial fishing salmon stamp under the following conditions:

(1) The crewmember is designated by name and commercial fishing license number on a form furnished by the department before salmon are taken on the vessel when that crewmember is aboard.

(2) The crewmember has a valid commercial fishing license issued under Section 7850.

(3) The commercial fishing salmon stamp for the crewmember is affixed to the form prescribed in paragraph (1) on which the vessel registration number of the vessel is entered and on which the crewmember who is exempted by this subdivision is designated by the last entered name and commercial fishing license number.

(g) Persons who are exempt from the license requirements, or who are not required to be licensed, pursuant to Section 7850, are exempt from the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 31.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.

(a) After deducting the administrative costs for issuing the commercial fishing salmon stamps, the department shall deposit the fees received pursuant to Section 7860 in the Commercial Salmon Stamp Dedicated Subaccount, which is hereby established in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. The money in the subaccount
 shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for new or expanded salmon restoration and enhancement programs in the state that will serve to increase ocean salmon landings. No money in this subaccount
 shall be used in lieu of other funds appropriated for salmon restoration and enhancement programs authorized by law on or before January 1, 1988.

(b) (1) Thirty dollars ($30) of the fees collected for each commercial fishing salmon stamp issued shall be allocated by the department to be used for raising chinook salmon to a yearling size, at which size they shall be released into state waters. The amount of salmon stamp revenues expended for this purpose in any fiscal year shall not exceed the amount expended by the department for the same purpose during the same period from other funds. The calculation of the amount expended by the department for this purpose shall not include expenditures made by the department for which reimbursements are received from state or federal agencies, public utilities, or private entities for raising chinook salmon to yearling size as part of a fish mitigation program
 instituted to compensate for the adverse effect of a dam on natural salmon production. If the department expends no funds other than moneys collected from the sale of commercial fishing salmon stamps or moneys for which reimbursements are received as part of an anadromous fish mitigation program for the raising of chinook salmon to yearling size within the period of a fiscal year, the fees prescribed in Section 7860 shall be reduced by an amount equivalent to that portion of the commercial fishing salmon stamp program, as specified in this subdivision.

(2) If the salmon stamps issued pursuant to Section 7860 raise more money for the purpose of this subdivision than is necessary to match the funds expended by the department during any fiscal year from other funds, then the excess salmon stamp revenue allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be carried over into the following fiscal year.

(c) The department shall post on its Internet Web site an accounting of the projects undertaken with funds from the Commercial Salmon Stamp Dedicated Subaccount and the costs incurred to administer the program. At a minimum, the Internet Web site shall list the project title, the applicant, a brief description of the project, the amount approved, and the status of the project.

(d) Any moneys that were in the Commercial Salmon Stamp Account as of March 14, 2013, and that were retained in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund shall be transferred to the Commercial Salmon Stamp Dedicated Subaccount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 368, Sec. 3.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.1.

Not more than 15 percent of the funds expended pursuant to Section 7861 may be used to pay the costs incurred in the administration of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 368, Sec. 4.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the department may receive on behalf of the Commercial Salmon Trollers Enhancement and Restoration Program, for deposit in the Commercial Salmon Stamp Dedicated Subaccount in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund established pursuant to Section 7861, funds from sources in addition to funds
 derived from the sale of commercial fishing salmon stamps, including, but not limited to, grants from the federal government, grants from private foundations, money disbursed from court settlements, and donations and bequeaths from individuals. The additional nonfederal funds shall not be deposited in the Commercial Salmon Stamp Dedicated Subaccount unless the person or entity providing the funds specifically designates in writing, prior to or at the time of transmittal of the funds to the department, that the funds are intended solely for deposit to that subaccount. Funds received by the department that are not
 designated at the time of receipt as being intended solely for deposit to the Commercial Salmon Stamp
 Dedicated Subaccount shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 368, Sec. 5.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department use the moneys from the sale of commercial fishing salmon stamps allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7861 and the matching share contributed by the department to raise approximately two million chinook salmon annually to yearling size to contribute to the replenishing of California’s salmon resource. In no case shall moneys from the General Fund be used to match the salmon stamp revenues expended for this program. It is the further intent of the Legislature that
 the salmon stamp fee authorized in subdivision (b) of Section 7861 shall generate revenues equal to one-half the amount necessary to raise this number of salmon to yearling size.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 862, Sec. 4.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.4.

A priority for funding shall be given to programs and projects restoring, enhancing, and protecting salmon streams with funds appropriated pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 5907 of the Public Resources Code, that employ fishermen who are unemployed or underemployed as a result of commercial fishing restrictions within and immediately adjacent to the Klamath Management Zone imposed by federal laws or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1237, Sec. 1.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.5.

In consultation with the Commercial Salmon Trollers Advisory Committee, the department may allocate funds from the Commercial Salmon Stamp Dedicated Subaccount in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund for the following purposes:

(a) For restoration projects to assist in the recovery of salmon stocks listed as threatened or endangered under Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3, or the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

(b) As matching
 funds for federal salmon restoration moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 368, Sec. 6.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7862.

A Commercial Salmon Trollers Advisory Committee shall be established consisting of six members selected by the director. One member shall be chosen from the personnel of the department. Four persons shall be selected, with alternates, from a list submitted by a fishermen’s organization deemed to represent the commercial salmon fishermen of California. One member shall be selected, with an alternate, from
 lists submitted by individual commercial passenger fishing boat operators or by organizations deemed to represent the commercial passenger fishing boat operators of California. The term of appointment to the committee shall be for two years. Necessary and proper expenses, if any, and per diem shall be paid committee members from the special account created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7861. The rate of per diem shall be the same as the rate established pursuant to Section 8902 of the Government Code.

The committee shall recommend programs and a budget from the special account to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 50.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7862.5.

(a) The Commercial Salmon Trollers Advisory Committee established under Section 7862 may recommend to the director that a nonprofit organization or the California Salmon Council be authorized to create or contract to create salmon or salmon fishing artwork and other materials based on that artwork, including, but not limited to, a stamp, and offer those items for sale to the public during 2003 and thereafter, for the purpose of augmenting funding for the Commercial Salmon Trollers Enhancement and Restoration Program established under this article.

(b) The committee may not recommend a nonprofit organization or the California Salmon Council as authorized under subdivision (a), unless all of the following conditions are
 met:

(1) The proposed creation and sale of the artwork is pursuant to a written business plan presented to the committee.

(2) The committee determines that a reasonable share of the sales of any stamp will be remitted to the department for deposit into the Commercial Salmon Stamp Dedicated Subaccount established in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund under Section 7861.

(3) The committee determines that the creation and sale of the artwork will act to increase public awareness and support for the salmon stamp program and the restoration of salmon and their habitats in the state.

(4) Any other conditions deemed necessary by the committee for determining whether to recommend approval to the director have been met.

(c) The director, upon receiving the recommendation of the committee, and upon finding that there will be no new costs to the department, may authorize the recommended entity to create or contract to create salmon or salmon fishing artwork and other materials based on that artwork, including, but not limited to, a stamp, and offer those items for sale to the public, for the purpose described in subdivision (a).

(d) No person or entity, including, but not limited to, any nonprofit organization, may use the name of the Commercial Salmon Stamp, the Commercial Salmon Trollers Advisory Committee, or the Commercial Salmon Trollers Enhancement and Restoration Program for the sale of artwork and
 other materials, unless that person or entity has been approved by the director under this section for that purpose. The approval of the director under this section shall be for one year, after which the approval may be renewed for an additional year, upon recommendation of the committee.

(e) No artwork sold in the form of a stamp under this section conveys to the purchaser any entitlement to engage in the commercial salmon fishery.

(f) Proceeds from the sales of artwork and other materials sold under this section, after deduction of all reasonable costs borne by the nonprofit organization or California Salmon Council for creation of the artwork and conducting the sales, shall be deposited in the Commercial Salmon Stamp
 Dedicated Subaccount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 368, Sec. 7.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7863.)
-------------------------------------------

7863.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 985, Sec. 4.   (SB 1309)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Article 3.5, commencing with Section 7860.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Vessel Registration [7880. - 7892.]

7880.

(a) A person owning or operating a vessel used in connection with fishing operations for profit who has been issued a commercial boat registration pursuant to Section 7881 shall display, for the purpose of identification, a department registration number on the vessel in a manner designated by the department.

(b) The method of displaying the registration number on the vessel shall be determined by the department after consultation with the Division of Boating and Waterways, taking into consideration the responsibilities and duties of the Division of Boating and Waterways as prescribed in the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(c) The registration number is not transferable, and it is a permanent fixture upon the vessel for which it is originally issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 88.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7881.

(a) Every person who owns or operates a vessel in public waters in connection with fishing operations for profit in this state, or who brings fish into this state, or who, for profit, permits persons to fish therefrom, shall submit an application for commercial boat registration on forms provided by the department and shall be issued a registration number.

(b) A commercial boat registration may be issued to any resident owner or operator of a vessel upon payment of a base fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The commercial boat registration shall be carried aboard the vessel at all times, and shall be posted in a conspicuous place.

(c) A commercial boat registration may be issued to any nonresident owner or operator of a vessel upon payment of a base fee of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750). The commercial boat registration shall be carried aboard the vessel at all times and shall be posted in a conspicuous place.

(d) If a registered vessel is lost, destroyed, or sold, the owner of the vessel shall immediately report the loss, destruction, or sale to the department.

(e) This section does not apply to any
 person required to be licensed as a guide pursuant to Section 2536.

(f) The base fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(g) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (f), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 24.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7891.

The law relating to the subject of control of fishing in state waters when delivery is to points beyond state waters was adopted as an initiative measure at the General Election of November 8, 1938. The reference to Section 845 in the last sentence is to Sections 8630 to 8632, inclusive, of this code. It reads as follows:

1110—No person shall use or operate or assist in using or operating in this State or the waters thereof, any boat or vessel used in connection with fishing operations
 irrespective of its home port or port of registration, which fishing boat or vessel delivers or by which there is delivered to any point or place other than within this State any fish, mollusks or crustaceans which are caught in, or taken aboard said boat or vessel from, the waters of the Pacific Ocean within this State or on the high seas or elsewhere, unless a permit authorizing the same shall have been issued by the Fish and Game Commission.

Where it appears to the commission that such permit will not tend to prevent, impede or obstruct the operation, enforcement or administration of this code or any provision thereof, and will not tend to result in fish, mollusks or crustaceans in the waters of this State being taken or used otherwise than is authorized by this code, the commission may issue revocable permits under such rules and regulations and upon such terms and conditions as it may prescribe to deliver fish, mollusks or crustaceans by the use of such boat or
 vessel outside of this State, provided that nothing herein shall authorize the transportation or carrying out of this State or any district thereof, of any fish, mollusks or crustaceans where the same is prohibited by law, and no permit shall be issued which may tend to deplete any species of fish, mollusk or crustacean, or result in waste thereof. Any person who uses or operates or assists in using or operating any boat or vessel in violation of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and such boat or vessel and the net, gear or other equipment of said boat or vessel is a public nuisance and shall be forfeited. It is the duty of every person authorized to make an arrest for the violation of any of the provisions of this code, to seize and keep such boat, vessel, net, gear or other equipment and to report such seizure to the commission. The commission shall thereupon commence, in the superior court of the county or city and county in which or nearest to which the seizure is made,
 proceedings for forfeiture of the seized property for its use in violation of this section, and such proceeding shall be had in the manner and according to the procedure provided by Section 845 of this code for the forfeiture of nets.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.   Note: This section sets out the text of Section 1110 (from the code prior to its 1957 reenactment) as added on November 8, 1938, by initiative Proposition 5. Because of its different subject matter, this section probably is not intended to be part of Article 4, which includes Sections 7880, 7881, and 7892.)
-------------------------------------------

7892.

The department shall issue to any person owning or operating an aircraft used in connection with commercial fishing operations in this state an aircraft registration for that aircraft. The registration shall be carried aboard the aircraft at all times when the aircraft is used in connection with commercial fishing operations. The fee for a commercial aircraft registration shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Commercial Passenger Fishing Boat Licenses [7920. - 7925.]

7920.

The owner of any boat or vessel who, for profit, permits any person to take fish, shall procure a commercial passenger fishing boat license.

This article applies only to a boat or vessel whose owner or his or her employee or other representative is with it when it is used for fishing.

A person operating a guide boat, as defined in Section 46, is not required to obtain a commercial passenger fishing boat license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7921.

The base fee for a commercial passenger fishing vessel license is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in the 2004 license year, which shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713. The commercial passenger fishing vessel license shall be issued to the holder of a commercial boat registration issued pursuant to Section 7881.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 140.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7923.

The holder of a license shall keep a true record in the English language of all fish taken, and shall comply with such regulations as the commission may prescribe. Such a record and the information contained in it shall be confidential, and the record shall not be a public record.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

7924.

Licenses issued under this article are subject to forfeiture, suspension, or revocation for a violation of Section 7121 and for any offense for which a commercial fishing license may be forfeited, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1052, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7925.

(a) If a commercial passenger fishing boat is used to take salmon or has salmon aboard in ocean waters north of Point Arguello, there shall be on board that vessel a total number of commercial fishing salmon stamps sufficient to have at least one for the operator and one for each crewmember required by United States Coast Guard regulations, excepting an operator or a crewmember who is exempt from the commercial fishing salmon stamp requirement of Section 7860. The commercial fishing salmon stamps shall be affixed to either the commercial fishing licenses of the operator and the crewmembers or, pursuant to subdivision (b), to the vessel’s commercial passenger fishing boat license. No person shall operate, or cause to be operated, a commercial passenger fishing boat in violation of this
 subdivision. Vessels permitted as commercial salmon fishing vessels pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 8230) of Chapter 2 are exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1053.1, the department may issue to the owner or operator of a vessel licensed pursuant to this article, upon application and payment of the fees prescribed in subdivision (c) of Section 7860, one commercial fishing salmon stamp for the operator and not more than one additional commercial salmon stamp for each crewmember required by the United States Coast Guard regulations. The commercial fishing salmon stamps issued under this subdivision shall be affixed to the vessel’s commercial passenger fishing boat license issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 141.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Commercial Fishing Reports [8010. - 8026.]

8010.

The department shall:

(a) Gather and prepare data of the commercial fisheries, showing particularly the extent of the fisheries and the extent to which the various species abound. 

(b) Make such investigations of the biology and the environment of the living marine resources as will aid in the collection and preparation of the statistical information necessary to determine the population dynamics of the species relative to their scientific management.

(c) Make such investigations as
 will disclose the optimum sustainable yield of the various marine resources.

(d) Determine what measures may be advisable to conserve any fishery, or to enlarge and assist any fishery where that may be done without danger to the supply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 798.)
-------------------------------------------

8022.

(a) (1) The landing receipts, reports, or other records filed with the department pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 7700) to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 8040), inclusive, the records filed with the commission pursuant to Section 8026, and the information they contain, shall, except as otherwise provided in this section, be confidential, and the records shall not be public records. Insofar as possible, the information contained in the records shall be compiled or published as summaries, so as not to disclose the individual record or business of any person.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the information and data
 relating to catch contained in the landing receipts and records of fishing activities described in paragraph (1) shall be confidential and shall not be public information.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may release the confidential information described in subdivision (a) only in the following circumstances:

 (A) To a federal agency responsible for fishery management activities, provided the
 information is used solely for the purposes of enforcing fishery management provisions and provided the information will otherwise remain confidential.

 (B) In
 accordance with Section 391 or pursuant to a court order.

(C) To a public or private postsecondary institution engaged in research under the terms of a legally binding confidentiality agreement.

(D) Or under other conditions as the commission by regulation may provide.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), fish business identification numbers, fish business names, commercial fishing license numbers, commercial fisher names, vessel registration identification numbers, and vessel names, exclusively, shall be deemed public information and may be provided upon request.

(c) All forms, logs, books, covers, documents, electronic data, software, and other records of any kind issued or otherwise supplied, directly or indirectly, by the department, the purpose of which is to provide a means for reports, records, or other information to be filed with the department pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 7700) to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 8040), inclusive, continue to be the property of the department. Those forms, logs, books, covers,
 documents, electronic data, software, other records, or portions thereof remain the property of the department whether used, unused, attached, or detached from their original binding, packaging, or other medium and shall be immediately surrendered upon demand to a peace officer of the department acting in their official capacity, without being altered in any manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8025.

(a) The commission, upon recommendation of the department, may suspend or revoke the commercial fishing privileges of any fisherman or the license of any person required to be licensed under Article 7 (commencing with Section 8030) who is convicted of a violation of this article or Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 8040).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1992.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1703, Sec. 16.   Section operative January 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8026.

(a) The commission may require the owner and operator of a commercial fishing vessel, the holder of a commercial fishing license or permit, and the owner and licenseholder of a commercial passenger fishing boat to keep and submit a complete and accurate record of fishing activities in a form prescribed by the department.

(b) In addition to the penalty specified in subdivision (b) of Section 12000 or subdivision (a) of Section 12002, failure to keep and submit records pursuant to subdivision (a) may result in the revocation or suspension of a license or permit by the department or the commission, when recommended by
 the department, for a period not to exceed one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   (AB 1611)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Commercial Fish Business Licenses [8030. - 8039.]

8030.

Any person who engages in any business for profit involving fish shall be licensed pursuant to this article, except as follows:

(a) A commercial fisherman who sells fish only to persons licensed under this article to purchase or receive fish from commercial fishermen and who does not engage in any activity described in Section 8034, 8035, or 8036 unless licensed to engage in both activities.

(b) A person licensed pursuant to Section 8460 who only takes, transports, or sells live freshwater fish for bait.

(c) A person who sells fish or
 aquaculture products only at retail to the ultimate consumer if that person does not conduct any activities described in Section 8033, 8035, or 8036.

(d) Pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000), a person who deals only in products of aquaculture.

(e) A person who deals only with nonnative live products that are not utilized for human consumption but that are utilized solely for pet industry or hobby purposes and who does not engage in the activities described in Section 8033.1.

(f) A person who is employed by the fish receiver to unload fish or fish products from a commercial fishing boat at a dock.

(g) A person who purchases, sells, takes, or receives live
 marine fish for use exclusively as live bait, that are not brought ashore, and who has registered as a live bait dealer with the department.

(h) A person who does not purchase or obtain fish, but who acts as an agent for others while negotiating purchases, or sales of fish in return for a fee, commission, or other compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 2.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8031.

(a) The following definitions govern the construction of this article: 

(1) “Process fish” means any activity for profit of preserving or preparing fish for sale or delivery to other than the ultimate consumer, including, but not limited to, cleaning, cutting, gutting, scaling, shucking, peeling, cooking, curing, salting, canning, breading, packaging, or packing fish. “Process fish” also means the activity for profit of manufacturing fish scraps, fish meal, fish oil, or fertilizer made from fish. “Process fish” does not include the cleaning,
 beheading, gutting, or chilling of fish by a licensed commercial fisherman which is required to preserve the fish while aboard a fishing vessel and which is to prevent deterioration, spoilage, or waste of the fish before they are landed and delivered to a person licensed to purchase or receive fish from a commercial fisherman. 

(2) “Wholesale” means the purchase of fish from persons licensed to purchase or receive fish from a commercial fisherman, processors, importers, or any other wholesaler for the purpose of resale to other than the ultimate consumer. 

(3) “Import” means receiving or purchasing fish taken outside of this state which are not landed in this state by a licensed commercial fisherman. 

(4) “Commercial fisherman” means a person who has a valid, unrevoked commercial fishing license issued pursuant to
 Section 7850. 

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1993.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1703, Sec. 20) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 80, Sec. 3.2.   Effective June 30, 1991.   Section operative January 1, 1993, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8032.

(a) A multifunction commercial fish business license shall be issued that authorizes any or all activities described in Section 8033, 8034, 8035, or 8036. The annual fee for this license is one thousand three hundred seventy-three dollars ($1,373).
